Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-2118
Utilities district; use of streets, alleys, or public grounds; duty to repair.

After entering the streets, alleys, or public grounds of the district in connection with the operation, construction, and maintenance of the utility facilities, it shall be the duty of the metropolitan utilities district and the board of directors, upon the completion of any such work, to resurface and repave the streets, alleys, or public grounds and leave the streets, alleys, or public grounds in the same condition as they were before the same were utilized by the district and the board of directors for such purpose.

Laws 1913, c. 143, § 7, p. 353;

R.S.1913, § 4249;

C.S.1922, § 3752;

C.S.1929, § 14-1008;

R.S.1943, § 14-1010;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1010;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 18.